Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 5. PROTECTION OF CONSUMER INTERESTS

SUBTITLE B. CONSUMER SERVICE PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 525. DELIVERY OF INSURANCE POLICIES

Sec. 525.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies to:

(1) an insurer, as defined by Section 2301.051, writing personal automobile insurance or residential property insurance, as defined by Section 2301.051, in this state;

(2) the Texas Windstorm Insurance Association;

(3) the FAIR Plan Association; and

(4) the Texas Automobile Insurance Plan Association.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 254 (S.B. 956), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 525.002. DELIVERY OF INSURANCE POLICIES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), an insurer to whom this chapter applies shall deliver a policy issued by the insurer to the policyholder, or to the insurer's agent for delivery to the policyholder:

(1) not later than:

(A) the 30th day after the effective date of the policy if the policy term is more than 30 days; or

(B) the 10th day after the effective date of the policy if the policy term is more than 10 days and less than 31 days; or

(2) within the policy period for a policy with a term of 10 days or less.

(b) An insurer to whom this chapter applies shall deliver a policy renewed or amended by the insurer to the policyholder, or to the insurer's agent for delivery to the policyholder, not later than the 15th day after the date the insurer or insurer's agent receives a written request from the policyholder that the policy be delivered to the policyholder.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 254 (S.B. 956), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 525.003. RULEMAKING AUTHORITY. The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 254 (S.B. 956), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.